Hawaii statutes.
§186-3 Applications; management plans.
(a) The owner of any property which complies with the requirements specified
in section 186-2 may apply to the board for classification of the owner's
property as tree farm property. The application shall comply with rules
adopted by the department to implement this section and shall include any
additional information required by the board. The application shall be signed
by all persons having an interest in or holding any encumbrance upon the
property and shall state that all of them will comply with the management plan
upon its approval.

(b) All public hearings required by statute or
rules of the department shall be held before any management plan is approved.
The management plan shall be available to the public not less than thirty days
before approval. Notice of its availability shall be published in the bulletin
of the office of environmental quality control. The plan shall be reviewed
periodically by the board or its employees or authorized agents at intervals of
no more than every five years. The review shall determine whether the owner
has met the objectives in the management plan. The board may approve or
require in consultation with the landowner alteration of the management plan to
adapt to current conditions. [L 1963, c 141, §4; Supp, §87D-4; HRS §186-3; gen
ch 1985; am L 1989, c 50, §2; am L 1994, c 207, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next